sq_AL.aff
FLAG long
SFX H2 Y 95
SFX H2 0 m [ai] po:verb is:v_dfta is:pl1
SFX H2 0 n [ai] po:verb is:v_dfta is:pl3
SFX H2 0 më [ej] po:verb is:v_dfta is:pl1
SFX H2 0 në [ej] po:verb is:v_dfta is:pl3
SFX H2 edh idhem edh po:verb is:j_dfta is:sg1
SFX H2 edh idhesh edh po:verb is:j_dfta is:sg2
SFX H2 edh idhemi edh po:verb is:j_dfta is:pl1
SFX H2 edh idheni edh po:verb is:j_dfta is:pl2
SFX H2 am ihen am po:verb is:j_dfta is:pl3
SFX H2 am ihet am po:verb is:j_dfta is:sg3
SFX H2 ap epem ap po:verb is:j_dfta is:sg1
SFX H2 ap epesh ap po:verb is:j_dfta is:sg2
SFX H2 ap epet ap po:verb is:j_dfta is:sg3
SFX H2 ap epemi ap po:verb is:j_dfta is:pl1
SFX H2 ap epeni ap po:verb is:j_dfta is:pl2
SFX H2 ap epen ap po:verb is:j_dfta is:pl3
SFX H2 eq iqem eq po:verb is:j_dfta is:sg1
SFX H2 eq iqesh eq po:verb is:j_dfta is:sg2
SFX H2 eq iqet eq po:verb is:j_dfta is:sg3
SFX H2 eq iqemi eq po:verb is:j_dfta is:pl1
SFX H2 eq iqeni eq po:verb is:j_dfta is:pl2
SFX H2 eq iqen eq po:verb is:j_dfta is:pl3
SFX H2 jek iqem jek po:verb is:j_dfta is:sg1
SFX H2 jek iqesh jek po:verb is:j_dfta is:sg2
SFX H2 jek iqemi jek po:verb is:j_dfta is:pl1
SFX H2 jek iqeni jek po:verb is:j_dfta is:pl2
SFX H2 jel ilem jel po:verb is:j_dfta is:sg1
SFX H2 jel ilesh jel po:verb is:j_dfta is:sg2
SFX H2 jel ilemi jel po:verb is:j_dfta is:pl1
SFX H2 jel ileni jel po:verb is:j_dfta is:pl2
SFX H2 jell illem jell po:verb is:j_dfta is:sg1
SFX H2 jell illesh jell po:verb is:j_dfta is:sg2
SFX H2 jell illemi jell po:verb is:j_dfta is:pl1
SFX H2 jell illeni jell po:verb is:j_dfta is:pl2
SFX H2 jep ipem jep po:verb is:j_dfta is:sg1
SFX H2 jep ipesh jep po:verb is:j_dfta is:sg2
SFX H2 jep ipet jep po:verb is:j_dfta is:sg3
SFX H2 jep ipemi jep po:verb is:j_dfta is:pl1
SFX H2 jep ipeni jep po:verb is:j_dfta is:pl2
SFX H2 jep ipen jep po:verb is:j_dfta is:pl3
SFX H2 m sh [^a]m po:verb is:j_dfta is:sg2
SFX H2 m t [^a]m po:verb is:j_dfta is:sg3
SFX H2 m ni [^a]m po:verb is:j_dfta is:pl2
SFX H2 m n [^a]m po:verb is:j_dfta is:pl3
SFX H2 n het n po:verb is:j_dfta is:sg3
SFX H2 n hen n po:verb is:j_dfta is:pl3
SFX H2 arr errem arr po:verb is:j_dfta is:sg1
SFX H2 arr erresh arr po:verb is:j_dfta is:sg2
SFX H2 arr erret arr po:verb is:j_dfta is:sg3
SFX H2 arr erremi arr po:verb is:j_dfta is:pl1
SFX H2 arr erreni arr po:verb is:j_dfta is:pl2
SFX H2 arr erren arr po:verb is:j_dfta is:pl3
SFX H2 er rem er po:verb is:j_dfta is:sg1
SFX H2 er resh er po:verb is:j_dfta is:sg2
SFX H2 er ret er po:verb is:j_dfta is:sg3
SFX H2 er remi er po:verb is:j_dfta is:pl1
SFX H2 er reni er po:verb is:j_dfta is:pl2
SFX H2 er ren er po:verb is:j_dfta is:pl3
SFX H2 err irrem qerr po:verb is:j_dfta is:sg1
SFX H2 err irresh qerr po:verb is:j_dfta is:sg2
SFX H2 err irret qerr po:verb is:j_dfta is:sg3
SFX H2 err irremi qerr po:verb is:j_dfta is:pl1
SFX H2 err irreni qerr po:verb is:j_dfta is:pl2
SFX H2 err irren qerr po:verb is:j_dfta is:pl3
SFX H2 es item [hqr]es po:verb is:j_dfta is:sg1
SFX H2 es itesh [hqr]es po:verb is:j_dfta is:sg2
SFX H2 es itemi [hqr]es po:verb is:j_dfta is:pl1
SFX H2 es iteni [hqr]es po:verb is:j_dfta is:pl2
SFX H2 esh ishem esh po:verb is:j_dfta is:sg1
SFX H2 esh ishesh esh po:verb is:j_dfta is:sg2
SFX H2 esh ishet esh po:verb is:j_dfta is:sg3
SFX H2 esh ishemi esh po:verb is:j_dfta is:pl1
SFX H2 esh isheni esh po:verb is:j_dfta is:pl2
SFX H2 esh ishen esh po:verb is:j_dfta is:pl3
SFX H2 ez izem ez po:verb is:j_dfta is:sg1
SFX H2 ez izesh ez po:verb is:j_dfta is:sg2
SFX H2 ez izemi ez po:verb is:j_dfta is:pl1
SFX H2 ez izeni ez po:verb is:j_dfta is:pl2
SFX H2 ërras irrem ërras po:verb is:j_dfta is:sg1
SFX H2 ërras irresh ërras po:verb is:j_dfta is:sg2
SFX H2 ërras irret ërras po:verb is:j_dfta is:sg3
SFX H2 ërras irremi ërras po:verb is:j_dfta is:pl1
SFX H2 ërras irreni ërras po:verb is:j_dfta is:pl2
SFX H2 ërras irren ërras po:verb is:j_dfta is:pl3
SFX H2 jerr irrem jerr po:verb is:j_dfta is:sg1
SFX H2 jerr irresh jerr po:verb is:j_dfta is:sg2
SFX H2 jerr irremi jerr po:verb is:j_dfta is:pl1
SFX H2 jerr irreni jerr po:verb is:j_dfta is:pl2
SFX H2 jes item jes po:verb is:j_dfta is:sg1
SFX H2 jes itesh jes po:verb is:j_dfta is:sg2
SFX H2 jes itet jes po:verb is:j_dfta is:sg3
SFX H2 jes itemi jes po:verb is:j_dfta is:pl1
SFX H2 jes iteni jes po:verb is:j_dfta is:pl2
SFX H2 jes iten jes po:verb is:j_dfta is:pl3
SFX H2 t n t po:verb is:j_dfta is:pl3

SFX H3 Y 21
SFX H3 ah eh ah po:verb is:v_dfta is:sg2
SFX H3 aj hen uaj po:verb is:j_dfta is:pl3
SFX H3 aj het uaj po:verb is:j_dfta is:sg3
SFX H3 al el al po:verb is:v_dfta is:sg2
SFX H3 al ilet al po:verb is:j_dfta is:sg3
SFX H3 e hen [bpt]ie po:verb is:j_dfta is:pl3
SFX H3 e het [bpt]ie po:verb is:j_dfta is:sg3
SFX H3 e ihet [lr]e po:verb is:j_dfta is:sg3
SFX H3 edh idhet edh po:verb is:j_dfta is:sg3
SFX H3 edh idhen edh po:verb is:j_dfta is:pl3
SFX H3 ej het ej po:verb is:j_dfta is:sg3
SFX H3 ej hen ej po:verb is:j_dfta is:pl3
SFX H3 ij jen vij po:verb is:v_dfta is:sg2
SFX H3 jeg igjet jeg po:verb is:j_dfta is:sg3
SFX H3 jeg igjen jeg po:verb is:j_dfta is:pl3
SFX H3 am e [jk]am po:verb is:v_dfta is:sg2
SFX H3 jam është jam po:verb is:v_dfta is:sg2
SFX H3 m në [jk]am po:verb is:v_dfta is:pl3
SFX H3 in ohet rrin po:verb is:j_dfta is:sg3
SFX H3 in ohen rrin po:verb is:j_dfta is:pl3
SFX H3 as et as po:verb is:v_dfta is:sg3

SFX H4 Y 9
SFX H4 e hen [pt]ie po:verb is:j_dfta is:pl3
SFX H4 j hem j po:verb is:j_dfta is:sg1
SFX H4 j hesh j po:verb is:j_dfta is:sg2
SFX H4 n hem n po:verb is:j_dfta is:sg1
SFX H4 n hesh n po:verb is:j_dfta is:sg2
SFX H4 as item as po:verb is:j_dfta is:sg1
SFX H4 as itesh as po:verb is:j_dfta is:sg2
SFX H4 as itemi as po:verb is:j_dfta is:pl1
SFX H4 as iteni as po:verb is:j_dfta is:pl2

SFX H5 Y 14
SFX H5 hem n hem po:verb is:v_dfta is:sg2
SFX H5 i ni [ckp]i po:verb is:v_dfta is:pl2
SFX H5 j n [aeëiouy]j po:verb is:v_dfta is:sg2
SFX H5 nj n nj po:verb is:v_dfta is:sg2
SFX H5 ua o ua po:verb is:v_dfta is:sg3
SFX H5 ua oni ua po:verb is:v_dfta is:pl2
SFX H5 as iten as po:verb is:j_dfta is:pl3
SFX H5 as itet as po:verb is:j_dfta is:sg3
SFX H5 es iten es po:verb is:j_dfta is:pl3
SFX H5 es itet es po:verb is:j_dfta is:sg3
SFX H5 ez izen ez po:verb is:j_dfta is:pl3
SFX H5 ez izet ez po:verb is:j_dfta is:sg3
SFX H5 jerr irren jerr po:verb is:j_dfta is:pl3
SFX H5 jerr irret jerr po:verb is:j_dfta is:sg3

SFX H6 Y 8
SFX H6 0 em [^ai] po:verb is:j_dfta is:sg1
SFX H6 0 esh [^ai] po:verb is:j_dfta is:sg2
SFX H6 0 emi [^ai] po:verb is:j_dfta is:pl1
SFX H6 0 eni [^ai] po:verb is:j_dfta is:pl2
SFX H6 0 hem [ai] po:verb is:j_dfta is:sg1
SFX H6 0 hesh [ai] po:verb is:j_dfta is:sg2
SFX H6 0 hemi [ai] po:verb is:j_dfta is:pl1
SFX H6 0 heni [ai] po:verb is:j_dfta is:pl2

SFX H7 Y 2
SFX H7 0 en [^ai] po:verb is:j_dfta is:pl3
SFX H7 0 hen [ai] po:verb is:j_dfta is:pl3

SFX H8 Y 9
SFX H8 j hemi j po:verb is:j_dfta is:pl1
SFX H8 j heni j po:verb is:j_dfta is:pl2
SFX H8 as it as po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX H8 as ite as po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX H8 as iti as po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX H8 as itju as po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX H8 as itma as po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX H8 as itmë as po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX H8 as itna as po:verb is:urdh is:sg2

SFX H9 Y 10
SFX H9 0 het [ai] po:verb is:j_dfta is:sg3
SFX H9 j het j po:verb is:j_dfta is:sg3
SFX H9 j hen j po:verb is:j_dfta is:pl3
SFX H9 as iteni as po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX H9 as itini as po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX H9 as itmani as po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX H9 as itmëni as po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX H9 as itnani as po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX H9 as ituni as po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX H9 as itni as po:verb is:urdh is:pl2

SFX G0 Y 1
SFX G0 0 ani [^gn]j po:verb is:urdh is:pl2

SFX H0 Y 6
SFX H0 0 ma [abcçdfghijklmnpqrstvz] po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX H0 0 më [abcçdfghijklmnpqrstvz] po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX H0 0 na [abcçdfghijklmnpqrstvz] po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX H0 0 mani [abcçdfghijklmnpqrstvz] po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX H0 0 mëni [abcçdfghijklmnpqrstvz] po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX H0 0 nani [abcçdfghijklmnpqrstvz] po:verb is:urdh is:pl2

SFX I0 Y 9
SFX I0 0 iu [gn] po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I0 0 ji [ai] po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I0 0 ju [abcçdfhijklmpqrstvz] po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I0 0 iani [gn] po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I0 0 jani [abcçdfhiklmpqrstvz] po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I0 0 jeni [ai] po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I0 0 jini [ai] po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I0 0 juni [abcçdfhijklmpqrstvz] po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I0 0 iuni [gn] po:verb is:urdh is:pl2

SFX J0 Y 4
SFX J0 0 e [bcçdfghjklmnpqrstvz] po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX J0 0 eni [bcçdfghjklmnpqrstvz] po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX J0 0 ini [bcçdfghjklmnpqrstvz] po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX J0 0 uni [bcçdfghjklmnpqrstvz] po:verb is:urdh is:pl2

SFX K0 Y 1
SFX K0 0 i [bcçdfghjklmnpqrstvz] po:verb is:urdh is:sg2

SFX L0 Y 1
SFX L0 0 u [ghik] po:verb is:urdh is:sg2

SFX I1 Y 4
SFX I1 ej hu [iy]ej po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I1 ej huni [iy]ej po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
SFX I1 j ni [aeëiouy]j po:verb is:v_dfta is:pl2
SFX I1 s t s po:verb is:v_dfta is:sg3

SFX I2 Y 3
SFX I2 0 et [bcçdfghjklmnpqrstvz] po:verb is:j_dfta is:sg3
SFX I2 0 hu [ai] po:verb is:urdh is:sg2
SFX I2 0 huni [ai] po:verb is:urdh is:pl2
